Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8116.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 56.4
THE BODY CAMERAS FOR CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES ACT
42-56.4-1. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Body Cameras for Correctional Facilities
Act".
42-56.4-2. Definitions.
The following words shall have the following meanings in this chapter:
(1) "Body camera" means a portable video recording device worn by correctional staff to
capture incidents occurring in real time within correctional facilities.
(2) "Incarcerated individuals" means any person held in custody within a facility operated
by the department of corrections.
(3) "Staff" means employees or contractors of the department of corrections, including
correctional officers, supervisors, and administrators.
42-56.4-3. Body camera requirements.
(a) All correctional staff assigned to direct supervision roles over incarcerated individuals
shall wear body cameras while on duty within the facilities.

(b) Staff shall activate body cameras during interactions with incarcerated individuals
including, but not limited to:
(1) Use of force incidents;
(2) Transporting individuals;
(3) Medical emergencies; and
(4) Disciplinary proceedings.
(c) Cameras shall record continuously during the aforementioned interactions and shall
only be deactivated once the situation is resolved and no further actions are anticipated.
42-56.4-4. Data access and retention.
(a) Recordings shall be retained for a minimum of sixty (60) days, after which the recording
shall be securely deleted unless required for an ongoing investigation or legal proceeding.
(b) Access to recordings is strictly limited to authorized personnel including investigators,
supervisors, and legal counsel as necessary.
(c) Incarcerated individuals shall be informed through posted notices regarding the use of
body cameras within the facility. When practical, individuals shall be notified if recording is
occurring at the time of the incident. Individuals shall have the right to request review of footage
that directly involves the individual under appropriate circumstances.
(d) Access by staff involved in recorded incidents. Any staff member involved in a
recorded use-of-force incident, complaint, or other critical incident shall submit an initial written
report prior to reviewing any body camera recording of the incident. Following submission of the
initial report, the staff member may review the recording and, if necessary, submit a supplemental
report, which shall be clearly designated as such and include the date and time of submission.
42-56.4-5. Accountability and oversight.
(a) The department of corrections shall establish an independent board pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (b) of this section to oversee the review of recorded incidents involving
use of force, complaints against staff, or other critical incidents involving incarcerated individuals.
(b) An independent incident oversight board (“IIOB”) shall be established, consisting of
members appointed by key stakeholders, including representatives from civil rights organizations,
legal experts, mental health professionals, formerly incarcerated individuals, and community
leaders.
(c) The IIOB shall:
(1) Oversee the review of recorded incidents involving use of force, complaints against
staff, or other critical incidents involving incarcerated individuals and investigate the complaints
and incidents and conduct periodic assessments and audits of facility operations, policies, and
LC005688 - Page 2 of 5

practices.
(2) Provide recommendations for improvements and reforms to the department of
corrections based on findings.
(d) Rules and regulations. The attorney general and director of the department of
corrections shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42 (administrative
procedures”) to implement and enforce the provisions of this chapter. Such rules and regulations
shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Standards governing the activation, deactivation, storage, retention, auditing, and
preservation of body camera recordings;
(2) Procedures governing access to recordings by staff, incarcerated individuals,
investigators, legal counsel, and oversight entities;
(3) The authority, procedures, and responsibilities of the independent incident oversight
board; and
(4) Enforcement mechanisms and corrective actions for noncompliance.
(5) The attorney general and director shall provide meaningful opportunity for public
comment, including at least one public hearing, prior to the adoption of any final rule or regulation.
42-56.4-6. Reporting requirement, training and non-compliance.
(a) The department of corrections shall provide biannual reports to the general assembly
detailing the number of incidents recorded, access requests made by incarcerated individuals, and
incidents reviewed by the incident review board.
(b) Comprehensive training shall be provided to all staff on the proper use of body cameras,
data privacy, and the importance of maintaining the dignity and rights of incarcerated individuals.
(c) Any staff who fail to comply with body camera policies established in this chapter shall
face disciplinary actions up to and including termination of employment, as well as potential civil
liabilities.
(d) The department of corrections shall conduct regular audits to ensure compliance with
this chapter and assess the effectiveness of body camera utilization.
42-56.4-7. Implementation.
(a) Legislative intent and passage. It is the intent of the general assembly to enhance safety,
accountability, and transparency within Rhode Island's correctional system and for the protection
of correctional officers, inmates, and staff that incidents subject to recording be captured in their
entirety.
(b) General implementation timeline. The department shall implement and establish the
necessary protocol and training programs for the statewide use of body cameras within six (6)
LC005688 - Page 3 of 5

months of the effective date of this chapter and written policies.
(c) Pilot program required. To ensure effective and accountable implementation, the
department shall initiate a structured pilot program within the timeframe set forth in subsection (b)
of this section. The pilot program shall deploy body-worn cameras in two (2) to three (3) high-
interaction operational settings, such as a housing unit and transportation detail.
(d) Pilot program duration. The pilot program shall be conducted for a period of not less
than six (6) months and not more than twelve (12) months.
(e) Funding responsibility. The director of the department of corrections, in coordination
with the attorney general's office, shall be responsible for identifying, writing, and obtaining all
necessary grants or other external funding from federal, state, or private sources to fully fund the
pilot program described in this section. A report on funding efforts shall be included in the
department's biannual report to the general assembly as required under § 42-56.4-6.
(f) Pilot oversight and evaluation. The pilot program shall be governed by the rules
promulgated under chapter 56 or title 42 (“corrections department”) and shall be subject to
oversight by the independent incident oversight board (“IIOB”). The department shall evaluate key
metrics including activation compliance, use-of-force incident resolution, complaint adjudication,
and safety indicators. The department shall provide a mid-pilot report and a final evaluation report
to the general assembly.
(g) Report and expansion plan. The final report required under subsection (f) of this section
shall include a comprehensive cost-benefit analysis, recommended policy adjustments based on
pilot findings, and a clear, evidence-based plan for statewide expansion, modification, or
discontinuation of the body camera program.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005688
========
LC005688 - Page 4 of 5